Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2 CONTROL OF WATER POLLUTION AND SURFACE-WATER USE
For comment, "Who Gets the Hooch?: Georgia, Florida, and Alabama Battle for Water From the Apalachicola-Chattahoochee-Flint River Basin," see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 1453 (2004).